Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.510

Processor's form showing maximum processing capacity.

In order to carry out the purposes of this chapter, the director may require a processor to annually complete a form prescribed by the director, which, when completed, will show the maximum processing capacity of each plant operated by the processor in the state of Washington. Such completed form shall be returned to the director by a date prescribed by him or her.

[ 2011 c 336 s 589; 2011 c 103 s 41; 1971 ex.s. c 182 s 16.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2011 c 103 s 41 and by 2011 c 336 s 589, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.